South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3315.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 22-5-190(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) Whenever a warrant is issued by a mayor, recorder, judge, or other proper judicial officer of any municipality requiring the arrest of any person charged with a violation of a municipal ordinance, or a state statute within the trial jurisdiction of the municipal authorities, and the person sought to be arrested is presently incarcerated in a jail or detention center of the county in which the municipality is located, law enforcement officers of that municipality with the assistance of law enforcement officials of the county operating the jail or detention center or a correctional officer employed at the jail or detention center may serve the warrant on that person without the necessity of a magistrate of the county endorsing the warrant as required by this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----